Utah statutes.
75-1-305.   Records and certified copies.

The clerk of the court shall keep a record for each decedent, ward, protected person, or trust involved in any document which may be filed with the court under this code, including petitions and applications, demands for notices or bonds, and of any orders or responses relating thereto by the registrar or court, and establish and maintain a system for indexing, filing, or recording which is sufficient to enable users of the records to obtain adequate information. Upon payment of the fees required by law the clerk must issue certified copies of any probated wills, letters issued to personal representatives, or any other record or paper filed or recorded. Certificates relating to probated wills must indicate whether the decedent was domiciled in this state and whether the probate was formal or informal. Certificates relating to letters must show the date of appointment.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

